Utah statutes.
26-4-28.   Testing for suspected suicides -- Maintaining information -- Compensation to deputy medical examiners.

(1)  In all cases where it is suspected that a death resulted from suicide, including assisted suicide, the medical examiner shall endeavor to have the following tests conducted upon samples taken from the body of the deceased:

(a)  a test that detects all of the substances included in the volatiles panel of the Bureau of Forensic Toxicology within the Department of Health;

(b)  a test that detects all of the substances included in the drugs of abuse panel of the Bureau of Forensic Toxicology within the Department of Health; and

(c)  a test that detects all of the substances included in the prescription drug panel of the Bureau of Forensic Toxicology within the Department of Health.

(2)  The medical examiner shall maintain information regarding the types of substances found present in the samples taken from the body of a person who is suspected to have died as a result of suicide or assisted suicide.

(3)  Within funds appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose, the medical examiner shall provide compensation, at a standard rate determined by the medical examiner, to a deputy medical examiner who collects samples for the purposes described in Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 167, 2013 General Session

